District of Columbia statutes.
50-2201.04c

Motor vehicle moving infractions in work zones; signage required.

(a)

For any motor vehicle moving infraction, as defined in Chapter 26 of Title 18 of the District of Columbia Municipal Regulations, committed by the driver within a work zone, during any time when traffic is regulated or restricted through or around the zone, when work is actually being performed in the zone by workers acting in their official capacity, the civil fine shall be double the amount otherwise prescribed and, in a criminal infraction case, the fine shall be one category higher than the penalty prescribed by law.

(b)

Signs or notices shall be affixed at the point of ingress of constriction or work zones alerting drivers of doubled fines and increased penalties for moving infractions within the zone.

History

Mar. 3, 1925, 43 Stat. 1119, ch. 443, § 9c
as added Jan. 23, 2008, D.C. Law 17-67, § 2(b), 54 DCR 11646

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Doubled Fines in Construction and Work Zones Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-149, October 18, 2007, 54 DCR 10894).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2(b) of Doubled Fines in Construction and Work Zones Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-252, January 23, 2008, 55 DCR 1264).